src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_kuadhus_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

    
  Noun - kuáđhuš: # MLO, checked
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Nom: kuáđhuš
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Gen: kuođhuu
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Acc: kuođhuu
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Ill: kuođhuužân
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Loc: kuođhuust
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Com: kuođhuin
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Abe: kuođhuuttáá
    kuáđhuš+N+Ess: kuođhuužin
    kuáđhuš+N+Par: kuođhuužid
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Nom: kuođhuuh
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Gen: kuođhui
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Acc: kuođhuid
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Ill: kuođhuid
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Loc: kuođhuin
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Com: [kuođhuiguin, kuođhuigijn]
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Abe: kuođhuittáá  
   
 
